Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3602
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Rights Act:

(1) Athletic grant-in-aid means the money given to a student-athlete by a postsecondary institution for tuition, fees, room, board, and textbooks as consideration for the student-athlete's participation in an intercollegiate sport for such postsecondary institution and does not include compensation for the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or likeness rights or athletic reputation;

(2) Collegiate athletic association means any athletic association, conference, or other group or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports;

(3) Compensation for the use of a student-athlete's name, image, or likeness rights or athletic reputation includes, but is not limited to, consideration received pursuant to an endorsement contract as defined in section 48-2602;

(4) Intercollegiate sport has the same meaning as in section 48-2602;

(5) Name, image, or likeness activity means an activity that involves the use of an individual's name, image, or likeness for commercial or promotional purposes;

(6) Postsecondary institution has the same meaning as in section 85-2403;

(7) Professional representation includes, but is not limited to, representation provided by an athlete agent holding a certificate of registration under the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act, a financial advisor registered under the Securities Act of Nebraska, or an attorney admitted to the bar by order of the Supreme Court of this state;

(8) Sponsor means an individual or organization that pays money or provides goods or services in exchange for advertising rights;

(9) Student-athlete has the same meaning as in section 48-2602; and

(10) Team contract means a contract between a postsecondary institution or a postsecondary institution's athletic department and a sponsor.

Laws 2020, LB962, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB1137, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1393, § 2.

Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act, see section 48-2601.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.